Utah statutes.
53A-8-105.   Hearings before district board or hearing officers -- Rights of
the board and the employee -- Subpoenas -- Appeals.
(1) (a)  Hearings are held under this chapter before the board or before
hearing officers selected by the board to conduct the hearings and make
recommendations concerning findings.
(b)  The board shall establish procedures to appoint hearing officers.
(c)  The board may delegate its authority to a hearing officer to make
decisions relating to the employment of an employee which are binding upon
both the employee and the board.
(d)  This Subsection (1) does not limit the right of the board or the employee
to appeal to an appropriate court of law.
(2)  At the hearings, an employee has the right to counsel, to produce
witnesses, to hear testimony against the employee, to cross-examine witnesses,
and to examine documentary evidence.
(3)  Subpoenas may be issued and oaths administered as provided under Section
53A-6-603.
